Tennessee, session 114, HB2289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-6-103(c), is amended by adding
the following to the end of the subsection:
The report must be provided in an electronic format.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2289
012604
- 1 -